Florida, session 2026, SB1262.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 9 10 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (11) of section 11 486.021, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 12 486.021âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, unless the 13 context otherwise requires, the term: 14 (11)ââPractice of physical therapyâ means the performance 15 of physical therapy assessments and the treatment of any 16 disability, injury, disease, or other health condition of human 17 beings, or the prevention of such disability, injury, disease, 18 or other health condition, and the rehabilitation of such 19 disability, injury, disease, or other health condition by 20 alleviating impairments, functional movement limitations, and 21 disabilities by designing, implementing, and modifying treatment 22 interventions through therapeutic exercise; functional movement 23 training in self-management and in-home, community, or work 24 integration or reintegration; manual therapy; massage; airway 25 clearance techniques; maintaining and restoring the 26 integumentary system and wound care; physical agent or modality; 27 mechanical or electrotherapeutic modality; patient-related 28 instruction; the use of apparatus and equipment in the 29 application of such treatment, prevention, or rehabilitation; 30 the performance of tests of neuromuscular functions as an aid to 31 the diagnosis or treatment of any human condition; or the 32 performance of electromyography as an aid to the diagnosis of 33 any human condition only upon compliance with the criteria set 34 forth by the Board of Medicine. 35 (a)âA physical therapist may implement a plan of treatment 36 developed by the physical therapist for a patient or provided 37 for a patient by a practitioner of record or by an advanced 38 practice registered nurse licensed under s. 464.012. The 39 physical therapist shall refer the patient to or consult with a 40 practitioner of record if the patientâs condition is found to be 41 outside the scope of physical therapy. If physical therapy 42 treatment for a patient is required beyond 30 days for a 43 condition not previously assessed by a practitioner of record, 44 the physical therapist shall have a practitioner of record 45 review and sign the plan. The requirement that a physical 46 therapist have a practitioner of record review and sign a plan 47 of treatment does not apply: 48 1.âWhen a patient has been physically examined by a 49 physician licensed in another state, the patient has been 50 diagnosed by the physician as having a condition for which 51 physical therapy is required, and the physical therapist is 52 treating the condition; or 53 2.âTo services provided for purposes of health promotion, 54 injury prevention, wellness, or fitness. 55 56 For purposes of this paragraph, a health care practitioner 57 licensed under chapter 458, chapter 459, chapter 460, chapter 58 461, or chapter 466 and engaged in active practice is eligible 59 to serve as a practitioner of record. 60 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.